Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-2102
Board of directors;
qualifications; election; outside member.

(1) In each metropolitan utilities
district service area, there shall be a board of directors consisting of seven
members. The members shall be elected as provided in section 32-540.

(2) Registered
voters within the boundaries of the district shall be registered voters of
such district. A registered
voter of the district shall
be eligible for the office of director subject to the special qualification
of residence for the outside member,
except that if the board of directors, by resolution, divides the territory
of the district into election subdivisions pursuant to subsection (2) of section
32-540, a registered voter of the district shall be eligible for the office
of director from the election subdivision in which he or she resides.

(3) The outside member specified
in section 32-540 shall be a registered voter residing within the district
but outside the corporate limits of the city of the metropolitan class for
which the district was created.

In the event
of the annexation of the area within which the outside member resides, he
or she may continue to serve as the outside member until the expiration of
the term of office for which such member was elected and until a successor
is elected and qualified.

Laws 1913, c. 143, § 3, p. 350;

R.S.1913, § 4245;

C.S.1922, § 3747;

C.S.1929, § 14-1003;

R.S.1943, § 14-1003;

Laws 1945, c. 17, § 1, p. 121;

Laws 1953, c. 22, § 1, p. 93;

Laws 1961, c. 32, § 1, p. 152;

Laws 1976, LB 665, § 1;

Laws 1977, LB 201, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1003;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 477;

Laws 2009, LB562, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB1014, § 1.